Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-169
Changed boundaries; copy of order filed in recorder's office; effect.

Upon a change of the boundaries of a district being made, a copy of the order of the board of directors ordering such change, certified by the president and secretary of the board, shall be filed for record in the recorder's office of each county within which are situated any of the lands of the district, and thereupon the district shall be and remain an irrigation district as fully and to every intent and purpose as if the lands which are included in the district by the change of the boundaries, as aforesaid, had been included therein at the original organization of the district.

Laws 1895, c. 70, § 42, p. 295;

R.S.1913, § 3500;

C.S.1922, § 2900;

C.S.1929, § 46-145;

R.S.1943, § 46-169.

Original boundaries, filing of order, see section 46-111.